Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5665SV (2) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2361 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 59, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 59. a. Develop and administer a seal of biliteracy program 3 to recognize students graduating from high school who have 4 demonstrated proficiency in two or more world languages, one of 5 which may be American sign language, though one of which must 6 be English. Participation in the program by a school district, 7 attendance center, or accredited nonpublic school shall 8 be voluntary. The department shall work with stakeholders 9 to identify standardized tests that may be utilized to 10 demonstrate proficiency. The department shall produce a seal 11 of biliteracy, which may include but need not be limited to 12 a sticker that may be affixed to a studentâs high school 13 transcript or a certificate that may be awarded to the student. 14 A participating school district or school shall notify the 15 department of the names of the students who have qualified for 16 the seal and the department shall provide the school district 17 or school with the appropriate number of seals or other 18 authorized endorsement. The department may charge a nominal 19 fee to cover printing and postage charges related to issuance 20 of the biliteracy seal under this subsection paragraph . 21 b. Develop and administer a seal of civics excellence 22 program to recognize students graduating from high school who 23 have demonstrated proficiency in civics. The department shall 24 determine the minimum requirements necessary for a student 25 to obtain a civics seal, including knowledge of American 26 government and participation in civic and community activities. 27 The department shall produce a civics seal, which may include 28 a sticker which may be affixed to a studentâs high school 29 transcript or a certificate awarded to the student. A seal of 30 civics excellence may be affixed to the diploma and noted on 31 the transcript of a student to recognize that the student has 32 achieved excellence in civics. Participation in the program 33 by a school district or accredited nonpublic school shall be 34 voluntary. A participating school district or accredited 35 -1- LSB 5665SV (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2361 nonpublic school shall notify the department of the names of 1 students who have qualified for a seal, and the department 2 shall provide the school district or accredited nonpublic 3 school with the appropriate number of seals or other authorized 4 endorsement. The department may charge a nominal fee to cover 5 printing and postal charges related to the issuance of the 6 civics seal under this paragraph. 7